District of Columbia statutes.
32-709

Rulemaking.

(a)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-114, § 10, 39 DCR 2861

Resolution 14-459, the “Domestic Partnership Registration Procedures and Fees Approval Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective June 14, 2002.

Resolution 16-920, the “Domestic Partnership Health Care Benefits Expansion Amendment Rulemaking Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective November 25, 2006.

Resolution 18-404, the “Domestic Partnership Certified List of Jurisdictions Approval Resolution of 2010”, was approved effective March 2, 2010.